District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0034.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA,
That this act may be cited as “Modification Nos. 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, and 6 to Contract No.
DCAM-22-CS-RFP-0026 with Chiaramonte Construction Company Approval and
Payment Authorization Emergency Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Pursuant to section 451 of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act,
approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 803; D.C. Official Code § 1-204.51), and
notwithstanding the requirements of section 202 of the Procurement Practices Reform
Act of 2010, effective April 8, 2011 (D.C. Law 18-371; D.C. Official Code § 2-352.02),
the Council approves Modification Nos. 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, and 6 to Contract No. DCAM-22-
CS-RFP-0026 with Chiaramonte Construction Company to provide construction services
for the Public Safety Communications Center building renovations, and authorizes payment
in the not-to-exceed amount of $13,693,879.06 for the goods and services received and to
be received under the contract.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement provided by the Chief Financial
Officer as the fiscal impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative
Procedures Act of 1975, approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code
§ 1-301.47a).
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto
by the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for
no longer than 90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of
Columbia in section 412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788; D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2